Utah statutes.
22-7-113.   Situs.

This chapter shall be construed as pertaining to the administration of a trust and shall be available to any trust that is administered in Utah under Utah law unless:

(1)  the governing instrument reflects an intention that the beneficiary or beneficiaries are to receive an amount other than a reasonable current return from the trust;

(2)  the trust is a trust described in Section 170(f)(2)(B), 664(d), 2702(a)(3), or 2702(b), Internal Revenue Code; or

(3)  the governing instrument expressly prohibits use of this chapter by specific reference to this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 244, 2013 General Session

